grammars/class.verb.lexc
LEXICON TransPast2Obj
[V][3sg.2.past]:ngun^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1sg.2ua.past]:benbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.2ua.past]:ngunbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1sg.2.past]:0^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.2pl.past]:ngundi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.2.past]:ngundi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.2pl.past]:bi^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON TransNonPast2Obj
[V][3sg.2.nonpast]:ngun^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1sg.2ua.nonpast]:benbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.2ua.nonpast]:ngunbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1sg.2.nonpast]:0^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.2pl.nonpast]:ngundi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.2.nonpast]:ngundi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][1pl.2pl.nonpast]:bi^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON TransPast1Obj
[V][2sg.1.past]:kan^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.1pl.past]:kan^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.1.past]:ngan^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2sg.1ua.past]:kanbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.1ua.past]:kanbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.1ua.past]:nganbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.1.past]:kandi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.1ua.past]:kandi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.1sg.past]:ngandi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.1ua.past]:ngandi^ DirPreBase ;

LEXICON TransNonPast1Obj
[V][2sg.1.nonpast]:kan^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.1pl.nonpast]:kan^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.1.nonpast]:ngan^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2sg.1ua.nonpast]:kanbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.1ua.nonpast]:kanbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3sg.1ua.nonpast]:nganbene^ DirPreBase ;
[V][2pl.1.nonpast]:kandi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.1ua.nonpast]:kandi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.1sg.nonpast]:ngandi^ DirPreBase ;
[V][3pl.1ua.nonpast]:ngandi^ DirPreBase ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                     !!
!!   PREBASE SLOTS                     !!
!!                                     !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON DirPreBase
[DIR.towards]:(ku)m^ AspPreBase ;
[DIR.away]:bal^ AspPreBase ;
0:0 AspPreBase ;

LEXICON AspPreBase
[IMM]:h^ Misc1PreBase ;
0:0 Misc1PreBase ;

LEXICON Misc1PreBase
[ADV.again]:yawoyh^ Misc1PreBase ;              ! again
[ADV.again]:yawoh^ Misc1PreBase ;               ! again
[ADV.together]:djorrk^ Misc1PreBase ;           ! together
[ADV.together]:djarrk^ Misc1PreBase ;           ! together
[ADV.again][ADV.together]:yawoyhdjarrk^ Misc1PreBase; ! again together
[ADV.a.bit]:woh^ Misc1PreBase ;                 ! a bit
[ADV.at.night]:kak^ Misc1PreBase ;              ! at night
[ADV.differently]:barrkid^ Misc1PreBase ;       ! differently
[ADV.properly]:wernh^ Misc1PreBase ;            ! properly
[ADV.vigorously]:ngudj^ Misc1PreBase ;          ! vigorously
[ADV.in.fear]:kele^ Misc1PreBase ;              ! in fear
[ADV.wrong]:warrebu^ Misc1PreBase ;             ! wrong
[ADJ.wounded]:ngoreng^ Misc1PreBase ;           ! do V while wounded
[ADJ.similar]:rohrouk^ Misc1PreBase ;           ! similar
[ADJ.similar]:rohrok^ Misc1PreBase ;            ! similar (alternate spelling)
[ADJ.cooked]:djoleng^ Misc1PreBase ;
[ASP.now]:bad^ Misc1PreBase ;                   ! now
[ASP.now][ADV.again]:badyawoyh^ Misc1PreBase ;       ! now again
[ASP.now][ADV.again]:badyawoh^ Misc1PreBase ;       ! now again
[ASP.before]:yingkih^ Misc1PreBase ;            ! before
[ASP.almost]:kuyin^ Misc1PreBase ;              ! almost
[ASP.nearly]:barlanh^ Misc1PreBase ;            ! nearly
[QUANT.each]:bebbeh^ Misc1PreBase ;             ! bebbeh
[QUANT.only]:djal^ Misc1PreBase ;               ! only
[QUANT.only][ADV.a.bit]:djalwoh^ Misc1PreBase ;      ! only a bit
[QUANT.many]:mirnde^ Misc1PreBase ;             ! many
0:0 BenefactPreBase ;

LEXICON BenefactPreBase                         ! benefactive infix makes the verb transitive
0:0 Misc2PreBase ;
@P.VALENCE.AUGM@[BEN]:@P.VALENCE.AUGM@marne^ Misc2PreBase ;

LEXICON Misc2PreBase
[QUANT.only]:djal^ AspPreBase2 ;
[QUANT.close.up]:darnh^ GINPreBase ;
[QUANT.small]:yaw^ AspPreBase2 ;
[QUANT.each]:bebbeh^ AspPreBase2 ;             ! bebbeh
[QUANT.many]:mirnde^ AspPreBase2 ;             ! many
0:0 GINPreBase ;

LEXICON AspPreBase2
[IMM]:h^ GINPreBase ;
0:0 GINPreBase ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                     !!
!!   INCORPORATED NOUNS                !!
!!                                     !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON GINPreBase
[GIN]:0 NounBase ;
0 BPINPreBase ;

LEXICON BPINPreBase ! names also fall into this category: any attributes of the person.
[BPIN]:balem^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:bard^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:berd^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:berl^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:berre^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:bodme^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:bid^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:bininj^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:dad^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:dang^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:dedj^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:denge^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:rrenge^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:dile^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:djen^ AdjPreBase ;                                          ! tongue
[BPIN]:djikka^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:kanem^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:keb^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:kodj^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:kom^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:kord^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:kuk^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:kurlah^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:kurlh^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:milh^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:mim^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:murrng^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:njam^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:nuk^ AdjPreBase ;
[BPIN]:rrulkki^ AdjPreBase ;                                    ! internal.sick
[BPIN]:yidme^ AdjPreBase ;
0:0 SPAPreBase ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                     !!
!!   POST-NOMINAL SLOTS                !!
!!                                     !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON AdjPreBase
[ADJ.tight]:djokko^ SPAPreBase ;
[ADJ.big]:kimuk^ SPAPreBase ;
[QUANT.many]:wern^ SPAPreBase ;
0:0 SPAPreBase ;

LEXICON SPAPreBase
0:0 COMPreBase ;    ! Spatial slot in Evans' grammar had no examples in Kunwinjku, so this is a pass-through for now

LEXICON COMPreBase
0:0 VerbValencyCheck ;
@P.VALENCE.AUGM@[COM]:@P.VALENCE.AUGM@yi^ VerbValencyCheck ;

LEXICON VerbValencyCheck
@R.VALENCE.AUGM@ AllVerbs ;
@R.VALENCE.INTR@ IntransitiveVerbs ;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@ TransitiveVerbs ; 

LEXICON AllVerbs
0:0 IntransitiveVerbs ;
0:0 TransitiveVerbs ; 

LEXICON anyVerbPostBase
0:0 V1PostBase ;
0:0 V2PostBase ;
0:0 V3aPostBase ;
0:0 V3bPostBase ;
0:0 V3cPostBase ;
0:0 V3dPostBase ;
0:0 V4aPostBase ;
0:0 V4bPostBase ;
0:0 V5aPostBase ;
0:0 V5bPostBase ;
0:0 V5cPostBase ;
0:0 V6aPostBase ;
0:0 V7aPostBase ;
0:0 V8PostBase ;
0:0 V9PostBase ;
0:0 V10PostBase ;
0:0 V11PostBase ;
0:0 ReVerbs ;
0:0 NonverbalPostBase ;

LEXICON V1PostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj ;
[PERSIST]:~iyindi^ PERSISTSConj ;   
0:0 V1Conj ;

LEXICON V1Conj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@~i^ # ;
[Imp]:n^ # ;
[Irr]:+ninj^ # ;
[Irr]:ninj^ # ;

LEXICON V2PostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj ;
[PERSIST]:~indi^ PERSISTSConj ;
0:0 V2Conj ;

LEXICON V2Conj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ # ;
[Imp]:men^ # ;
[Irr]:meninj^ # ; 

LEXICON V3aPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj ;
[PERSIST]:yindi^ PERSISTSConj ;
0:0 V3aConj ;

LEXICON V3aConj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@0^ # ;
[Imp]:0^ # ;
[Irr]:yinj^ # ; 
[Irr]:yi^ # ; 

LEXICON V3bPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ # ;
[Imp]:0^ # ;
[Irr]:yinj^ # ;
[Irr]:yi^ # ; 

LEXICON V3cPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj ;
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ # ;
[Imp]:0^ # ;
[Irr]:yinj^ # ;
[Irr]:yi^ # ; 

LEXICON V3dPostBase
[RR]:rre^ RRConj ;
[PERSIST]:yindi^ PERSISTSConj ;
0:0 V3dConj ;

LEXICON V3dConj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~inj^ # ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ # ;
[Imp]:0^ # ;
[Irr]:yinj^ # ; 
[Irr]:yi^ # ; 

LEXICON IntransitiveVerbs
bengdayhme:bengdayhme^ V1PostBase ;                             ! remember, realize
bengka:bengka^ V3aPostBase ;                                    ! understand, comprehend
bukme:bukme^ V3dPostBase ;                                     ! dry up
burlurlhme:burlurlhme^ V1PostBase;                             ! Swell up
dimhme:dimhme^ V1PostBase ;
djangwe:djangwe^ V2PostBase ;
djudme:djudme^ V1PostBase ;                                     ! stick in
djurrkwo:djurrkwo^ V3cPostBase ;                                  ! get excited, be enthousiastic
dolka:(rr)olka^ V3aPostBase ;                            ! get up
dubbe:dubbe^ V1PostBase ;                                      ! block
dulkkimanka:(rr)ulkimanka^ V3aPostBase ;
kawo:kawo^ V3cPostBase ;                                      ! disturb
kewkme:kewkme^ V1PostBase; 
kombukdowe:kombukdowe^ V2PostBase ;
kukyime:kukyime^ V1PostBase ;
manka:manka^ V3aPostBase ;                              ! fall, land
menmenyime:menmenyime^ V1PostBase ;
ngamka:ngamka^ V3bPostBase ;                                    ! swim 
ngeyhme:ngeyhme^ V1PostBase;                            ! moan
ngomka:ngomka^ V3bPostBase ;                                    ! swim 
njudjme:njudme^ V1PostBase ;                                     !
roka:roka^ V3aPostBase ;
wake:wake^ V2PostBase ;                                       ! crawl, walk
warrewo:warrewo^ V3cPostBase ;                                   ! make a mistake
wohna:wohna^ V3bPostBase ;
wokna:wokna^ V3bPostBase ;                                     ! speak, talk, make sound
woybukwo:woybukwo^ V3cPostBase ;
yerrka:yerrka^ V3aPostBase ;                                    ! sit
yerrkme:yerrkme^ V1PostBase ;
LEXICON TransitiveVerbs
balewo:balewo^ V3cPostBase ;                                    ! clean (something)
barlke:barlke^ V2PostBase ;                                     ! fill
bawo:bawo^ V3cPostBase ;                                        ! leave, give up (something)        
behke:behke^ V2PostBase ;
bengwarrewo:bengwarrewo^ V3cPostBase ;
bernelka:bernelka^ V3aPostBase ;
bidbuyhwe:bidbuyhwe^ V2PostBase ;
bidjibme:bidjibme^ V1PostBase ;
bimna:bimna^ V3bPostBase ;
birrka:birrka^ V3aPostBase ;
bolka:bolka^ V3aPostBase ;
bolkbawo:bolkbawo^ V3cPostBase ;
bolkna:bolkna^ V3bPostBase ;
bolknahna:bolknahna^ V3bPostBase ;
borna:borna^ V2PostBase ;                                      ! beget (eg a child)
borna:borna^ V3bPostBase ;
burrkna:burrkna^ V3bPostBase ;                                   ! recognise, understand
dabke:dabke^ V2PostBase ;
denghke:denghke^ V2PostBase ;
djangka:djangka^ V3aPostBase ;                                   ! hunt
djikkawo:djikkawo^ V3cPostBase ;
djorrngme:djorrngme^ V1PostBase ;
djowkke:djowkke^ V2PostBase ;                                    ! cross over
dokmiwe:dokmiwe^ V2PostBase ;
duhke:duhke^ V2PostBase ;
ka:ka^ V3aPostBase ;                                        ! take, carry along
kan:kan^ V3aPostBase ;
kawo:kawo^ V3cPostBase ;
kukburriweke:kukburriweke^ V2PostBase ;                               ! throw down, 2. hit an animal while hunting
kukwarrewo:kukwarrewo^ V3cPostBase ;
kurduna:kurduna^ V3bPostBase ;
manjbekka:manjbekka^ V3aPostBase ;
marnebebme:marnebebme^ V1PostBase ;
na:na^ V3bPostBase ;                                        ! see (trns)
nahnan:nahna^ V3bPostBase ;                                     ! look after, care for
ngehke:ngehke^ V2PostBase ;
ngimewo:ngimewo^ V3cPostBase ;                                   ! put (something)
ngorrka:ngorrka^ V3bPostBase ;                                   ! carry on shoulders 
ngunjdjikka:ngunjdjikka^ V3aPostBase ;
rawo:rawo^ V3dPostBase ;                                      ! combine, mix, add
warrewo:warrewo^ V3cPostBase ;                                   ! ruin, damage
werrhme:werrhme^ V1PostBase ;
widnan:widna^ V3bPostBase ;                                     ! hate, dislike
wo:wo^ V3cPostBase ;                                        ! give
worrumbokka:worrumbokka^ V3aPostBase ;
yakwo:yakwo^ V3cPostBase ;                                  ! finish
yarlarrke:yarlarrke^ V2PostBase ;
yika:yika^ V3bPostBase ;
